New Jersey, session 221, A4374.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. It shall be a crime of the fourth degree for an employer to: (1)   knowingly falsify a certified payroll record or other record required pursuant to the provisions of the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.); or (2)   1[willfully] knowingly1 make, or cause to be made, a false, deceptive, or fraudulent statement on a public works contractor registration form in connection with the requirements pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.52). b.    A county prosecutor or the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, as appropriate, shall notify the Attorney General that a violation of this section has occurred so that the Attorney General may make a determination regarding whether to exercise the authority granted to the Attorney General pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1970, c.74 (C.52:17B-106) to supersede a county prosecutor for the purpose of prosecuting or investigating the violation or, if appropriate, to refer the case to the county prosecutor for investigation and prosecution or other appropriate legal action. c.     A penalty imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other penalty that may be imposed in connection with the offense. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.